Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Chapter 57

Tennessee State Fair and Exposition Act

4-57-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Tennessee State Fair and Exposition Act.”

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee State Fair and Exposition Act's regulation of the use of the name “Tennessee State Fair” does not infringe any constitutional right of the board of fair commissioners of the metropolitan government of Nashville and Davidson County even if the name has been registered as a trademark. OAG 13-57, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (7/22/13).

4-57-102. Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the commission created herein shall be the sole body in Tennessee charged with administering a state fair and exposition.

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

4-57-103. Chapter definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter unless the context otherwise requires:

“Commission” means the Tennessee state fair and exposition commission;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of agriculture;

“Department” means the department of agriculture;

“Exhibition” means one (1) or more displays or demonstrations which are of educational or entertainment value to those witnessing such exhibition; and

“Fair” or “exposition” means an exhibition of agricultural, business, manufacturing, or other industries and labor, education service organizations, social and religious groups or any other events or activities consistent with the general welfare and interests of the people of the state, and includes such services as are necessary for the care and comfort or amusement of the public. Such services include rest areas, sanitary and other such comforts, and concessions for food, drink, amusements, and the sale of trinkets.

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

4-57-104. State fair and exposition commission.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary establishing a state fair board, there is hereby created a state fair and exposition commission which shall be composed of the following members to be appointed by the governor:

The dean of the University of Tennessee extension;

The president of the Tennessee Farm Bureau;

The state advisor of the Future Farmers of America;

The executive director of the Tennessee Association of Fairs;

The chair of the Tennessee State Fair Association;

The commissioner of agriculture; and

The dean of the Tennessee State University, college of agriculture cooperative extension program.

Within sixty (60) days of creation of the commission, the commission members shall establish by rule a method of selecting a chair for the commission and shall select a chair. The chair shall serve a two-year term but shall be limited to no more than two (2) consecutive terms. Commission members shall serve on the commission as long as the member holds the position the member held at the time of initial appointment.

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; 2018, ch. 1014, § 1; 2019, ch. 342, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee State Fair and Exposition Act's regulation of the use of the name “Tennessee State Fair” does not infringe any constitutional right of the board of fair commissioners of the metropolitan government of Nashville and Davidson County even if the name has been registered as a trademark. OAG 13-57, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (7/22/13).

4-57-105. Authority and powers of the commission.

The commission is authorized and empowered to:

Advise, facilitate, and coordinate with the Tennessee State Fair Association, a not-for-profit corporation, for the purpose of the Tennessee State Fair Association operating, managing, and conducting at least one (1) fair or exposition annually, under the supervision of the commission, with such additional fairs, expositions, or exhibitions as the commission determines are in the general public interest;

Enter into any contracts and agreements necessary and do and perform any acts necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter;

Maintain and manage property held by the state for the purpose of conducting fairs, expositions, and exhibits;

Accept gifts, contributions and bequests of unrestricted funds from individuals, foundations, corporations and other organizations or institutions for the purpose of furthering the objectives of the commission's programs;

Accept on behalf of the state conveyances of property for the purposes of conducting fairs, expositions, and exhibits, subject to any terms and conditions agreed to by the commission;

Sell or convey all or a portion of the property, land, or buildings under its management subject to the approval of the state building commission;

Grant leases on all or any part of the property, land, or buildings under the management of the commission to private or public organizations, which appear to be in the best interests of the state;

Recommend to the commissioner such rules and regulations that should be promulgated in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title, in order to carry out the purposes of the commission; and

Form advisory panels, as needed, from qualified persons within the state to obtain their advice and counsel on matters pertaining to the state fair. Members of these panels shall serve at the will and pleasure of the commission and shall receive no compensation.

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; 2018, ch. 1014, § 2.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

4-57-106. Use of the name “Tennessee State Fair” or “Tennessee State Exposition”.

The use of the name “Tennessee State Fair” or “Tennessee State Exposition” in Tennessee to denote a fair serving the state shall only be granted by the department of agriculture with the approval of the commission.

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.

Attorney General Opinions. The Tennessee State Fair and Exposition Act's regulation of the use of the name “Tennessee State Fair” does not infringe any constitutional right of the board of fair commissioners of the metropolitan government of Nashville and Davidson County even if the name has been registered as a trademark. OAG 13-57, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 57 (7/22/13).

4-57-107. State audit included as part of the department of agriculture audit.

The division of state audit shall include as part of its scheduled audit of the department of agriculture a review of the Tennessee state fair and exposition commission including, but not limited to, the commission's authority and function.

Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 purported to enact title 4, chapter 57. Title 4, chapter 57 was previously enacted by Acts 2012, ch. 1047, § 1; therefore, the enactment by Acts 2012, ch. 1061, § 1 was designated as title 4, chapter 58 by the code commission.